North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-57.
Secrecy as to returns — Penalty.

The secrecy of returns must be guarded except as follows:

Except as is otherwise specifically provided by law, the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner’s deputies, agents, clerks, and other officers and employees, may not divulge nor make known, in any manner, whether or not any report or return required under this chapter has been filed, the amount of income, or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any report or return required under this chapter, including the copy or any portion thereof or information reflected in the taxpayer’s federal income tax return that the tax commissioner may require to be attached to, furnished with, or included in the taxpayer’s state income tax return. This provision may not be construed to prohibit the publication of statistics, so classified as to prevent the identification of particular reports or returns, and the items thereof, or the inspection by the attorney general or other legal representatives of the state of the report or return of any taxpayer who shall bring action to set aside or review the tax based thereon, or against whom an action or proceeding has been instituted to recover any tax or any penalty imposed by this chapter. This section does not prohibit disclosure of the fact that a report or return required under this chapter has not been filed if the disclosure is made to further a tax investigation being conducted by the tax commissioner. Reports and returns must be preserved for three years and thereafter until the tax commissioner orders them to be destroyed.

A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order or subpoena directing the tax commissioner to disclose state tax return information to a local, state, or federal law enforcement official conducting a criminal investigation if the court determines that the facts submitted by the applicant satisfy the following:

There is probable cause to believe that a specific criminal act has been committed and that the return or return information constitutes evidence of a criminal offense or may be relevant to a matter relating to the commission of the criminal offense;

The return or return information is sought exclusively for use in a criminal investigation or proceeding concerning such act; and

The information sought to be disclosed cannot reasonably be obtained under the circumstances, from another source.

Before obtaining an order under this subsection, a law enforcement official may request information from the tax commissioner as to whether a taxpayer, which is the subject of a criminal investigation for which a return or return information is or may be relevant to the commission of a criminal offense, has complied with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this request, the tax commissioner is limited to stating that the taxpayer has or has not complied with these requirements.

Except as required during court proceedings, tax return information disclosed to law enforcement under this section remains confidential during an active criminal investigation, after the investigation, after prosecution concludes, or until the time period for appeals has expired, whichever is later.

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

The tax commissioner, however, may permit the commissioner of internal revenue of the United States or the proper officer of any state or of the District of Columbia or of any territory of the United States, imposing an income tax similar to that imposed by this chapter, or the authorized representative of any such officer or the authorized agent of the multistate tax commission, to inspect the income tax returns of any taxpayer, or may furnish to such officer or the officer’s authorized representative an abstract or copy of the return of income of any taxpayer, or supply the officer or representative with information concerning any item contained in any return, or disclosed by the report of any investigation of the income, or return of income, of any taxpayer, but such permission may be granted, or such information furnished, to such officers or representatives only if the statutes of the United States or of such other state or of the District of Columbia or of a territory of the United States, as the case may be, grant substantially similar privileges to the proper officer of this state charged with the administration of this chapter; provided, that any information furnished or made available by the tax commissioner to any other person pursuant to this subsection may be used by such person only for tax administration purposes; and provided, further, that similar information furnished or made available to the tax commissioner by a representative or officer of the United States or of any other state or of the District of Columbia or a territory of the United States may be used by the tax commissioner only for tax administration purposes.

The tax commissioner is hereby authorized to furnish to workforce safety and insurance, to job service North Dakota, or to the secretary of state, upon their request a list or lists of employers showing only the names, addresses, and the tax department file identification numbers of such employers; provided, that any such list may be used only for the purpose of administering the duties of the requesting governmental unit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to confidentiality of information contained on returns, the tax commissioner may use information for income and withholding tax compliance purposes contained on any federal form W-2 or federal form 1099 filed under subsection 3 or 4 of section 57-38-60, a fiduciary return filed under section 57-38-07, a return filed by a subchapter S corporation under section 57-38-32, or an information at the source return filed under section 57-38-42.

Upon request, the tax commissioner may furnish to the unclaimed property division of the board of university and school lands, a taxpayer’s name, address, and federal identification number for identifying the taxpayer as the owner of an unclaimed voucher authorized by the tax commissioner or to locate the apparent owner of unclaimed property as provided under chapter 47-30.2.

The tax commissioner, upon written request from the director of the North Dakota lottery, may provide a written statement to the director, employees, or agents of the North Dakota lottery, in which the tax commissioner is limited to stating that the lottery retailer applicant has complied or not complied with the requirements of this chapter. The information obtained under this subsection is confidential and may be used for the sole purpose of determining whether the applicant meets the requirements of subsections 3, 4, and 5 of section 53-12.1-07.

The tax commissioner, upon written request from the secretary of commerce of the United States, may furnish officers and employees of the bureau of census an individual taxpayer’s identification number and county of residence as reported on the individual’s return. However, any information obtained may be used only for the purpose of establishing migration methodologies in estimating the annual shifts in the state’s population. A person who receives return information under this subsection may not disclose the return information to any person other than the taxpayer to whom it relates except in a form that cannot be associated with, or otherwise identify, directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.

The tax commissioner may disclose a taxpayer’s name, address, and identification number to the Bank of North Dakota for the sole purpose of administering the tax deduction for contributions to the North Dakota higher education savings plan.

The tax commissioner may disclose confidential tax information to the insurance commissioner to be used for the sole purpose of suspending, revoking, placing on probation, refusing to continue or refusing to issue an insurance producer license, assessing a civil penalty, or investigating fraudulent insurance acts under the insurance laws of this state. The tax information may be disclosed only upon written request that provides the taxpayer’s name, federal identification number, and address. The insurance commissioner may make a written request only if the insurance commissioner has started an investigation of an applicant or licensee on grounds other than failure to comply with chapter 57-38 or has started an investigation of a suspected or actual fraudulent insurance act. Upon receipt of the request, the tax commissioner may disclose whether the taxpayer has complied with the requirements of this chapter. If the taxpayer has not complied with these requirements, the tax commissioner may provide the tax type, the tax period for which a return has not been filed, and if the taxpayer has failed to pay any tax, the amount of tax, penalty, and interest owed. The information obtained under this subsection is confidential and may be used only for the purposes identified in this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a taxpayer is deemed in compliance with this chapter if the taxpayer has entered an agreement with the tax commissioner to cure the taxpayer’s noncompliance and the taxpayer is current with those obligations under the agreement.

The tax commissioner may provide the department of commerce information obtained in the administration of the income tax under this chapter. A request by the department of commerce for information must be in writing and must be limited to information necessary to evaluate the degree of success and compliance with statutory or contractual performance standards established for employers who received North Dakota state economic development assistance. A request under this subsection does not require the tax commissioner to compile or create a record, including compiling or creating a record from electronically stored information, which does not exist. Information received by the department of commerce under this subsection may not be divulged by the department of commerce except in an aggregate format that does not permit taxpayer identification and any information contained in the returns or reports filed by a taxpayer.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 44; 1925 Supp., § 2346a43; R.C. 1943, § 57-3857; S.L. 1969, ch. 516, § 2; 1973, ch. 472, § 2; 1975, ch. 106, § 673; 1977, ch. 507, § 5; 1979, ch. 597, § 7; 1987, ch. 700, § 1; 1989, ch. 509, § 3; 1995, ch. 565, § 1; 2001, ch. 531, § 1; 2003, ch. 441, § 2; 2003, ch. 454, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 470, § 6; 2007, ch. 89, § 4; 2009, ch. 554, § 1; 2013, ch. 455, § 2; 2013, ch. 454, § 2; 2015, ch. 354, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 337, § 19, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Contract with collection agency for collection of delinquent taxes, see N.D.C.C. § 57-01-13.

57-38-58.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 695, § 8.

57-38-59.
Withholding from wages of employees — Penalty.

Except as provided in section 57-38-59.3, every employer making payment of wages to employees shall deduct and withhold from their wages such percentage or percentages, as determined by the tax commissioner, multiplied times the total amount required to be deducted by an employer from wages of an employee under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as will approximate the income taxes due the state. The amount of tax withheld must be computed without regard to any other amount required to be withheld, but the tax withheld must as closely as possible pay any tax liability imposed by this chapter.

In the event that the tax deducted and withheld under subsection 1 should prove to be disproportionate to the tax liability, the tax commissioner may adjust the percentage that, when withheld, will, as closely as may be possible, pay the income tax liability imposed by this chapter.

The tax commissioner may, in lieu of the requirement above for deducting and withholding tax based upon a percentage of federal income tax withheld, adopt by rule tax tables that, when the tax provided for in the tables is withheld, will, as closely as possible, pay the income tax liability imposed by this chapter. When adopted by the tax commissioner, said tables must be followed by every employer required to deduct and withhold any tax imposed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 2; 1969, ch. 517, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 609; 1987, ch. 695, § 3, R.M. approved March 18, 1987; 2011, ch. 464, § 1.

57-38-59.1.
Reciprocal arrangement with other states for withholding income taxes.

The tax commissioner may enter into an agreement with the tax commissioner or other taxing officials of another state for the interpretation and administration of the acts of their several states providing for the collection of income tax at source on wages for the purpose of promoting fair and equitable administration of such acts and to eliminate duplicate withholding. The tax commissioner may furnish information on a reciprocal basis to the taxing officials of another state in order to implement the purposes set forth above.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 518, § 1.

57-38-59.2.
Withholding of lottery winnings.

The North Dakota lottery shall deduct and withhold at the highest marginal rate provided in section 57-38-30.3 of the total proceeds of state lottery winnings as North Dakota withholding tax if the winnings are subject to withholding. For purposes of this section, “winnings subject to withholding” means the proceeds in excess of five thousand dollars won from a lottery game operated pursuant to chapter 53-12. Every person who receives a payment from the winnings that are subject to withholding shall furnish the lottery director with a statement, made under the penalties of perjury, containing the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the recipient. The North Dakota lottery shall file returns as provided in section 57-38-60 and is liable for the payment of the tax required to be withheld but is not liable to any person for the amount of the payment.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 565, § 1; 2011, ch. 459, § 9.

57-38-59.3.
Nonresident mobile workforce — Computation of taxable income — Exclusion — Exception for employer withholding — Returns required.

Compensation subject to withholding under section 57-38-59, without regard to subsection 3, that is received by a nonresident for employment duties performed in this state, shall be excluded from state source income if:

The nonresident has no other income from sources in this state for the tax year in which the compensation was received;

The nonresident is present in this state to perform employment duties for not more than twenty days during the tax year in which the compensation is received. Presence in this state by the nonresident for any part of a day constitutes presence for that day unless the presence is purely for purposes of transit through the state; and

The nonresident’s state of residence provides a substantially similar exclusion or does not impose an individual income tax or the nonresident’s income is exempt from taxation by this state under the United States Constitution or federal statute.

This subsection does not apply to compensation received in this state by:

A professional athlete or member of a professional athletic team;

A professional entertainer performing services in the professional performing arts;

A person of prominence performing services for compensation on a per event basis;

A person performing construction services to improve real property;

A key employee under section 416(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended [26 U.S.C. 416(i)], for the year immediately preceding the current tax year. A determination under this paragraph must be made without regard to ownership or the existence of a benefit plan; or

An employee of a noncorporate employer, who would be a key employee without regard to ownership or the existence of a benefit plan, for the year immediately preceding the current tax year under section 416(i) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 416(i)], if the term “employee” were substituted for the term “officer” in section 416(i)(1)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code and if such person is one of the noncorporate employer’s fifty highest paid employees without regard to whether such person is an officer.

This subsection shall not prevent the operation, renewal, or initiation of any agreement with another state authorized under section 57-38-59.1.

This subsection creates an exclusion from nonresident compensation under certain de minimus circumstances and has no application to this state’s jurisdiction to impose this or any other tax on any taxpayer.

A nonresident whose only state source income is compensation excluded under subsection 1 does not have an income tax liability and is not required to file a return as prescribed in section 57-38-31, except nothing in this subsection prohibits the tax commissioner from exercising the commissioner’s discretion to require the filing of an informational return by a nonresident employee described in subdivision a of subsection 1.

This subsection is applicable to the determination of an individual income taxpayer’s filing requirement and has no application to the imposition of, or this state’s jurisdiction to impose, this or any other tax on any taxpayer.

No amount is required to be deducted or retained from compensation paid to a nonresident for employment duties performed in this state if the compensation is excluded from state source income under subsection 1, without regard to paragraph 1 of subdivision a of subsection 1. The number of days a nonresident employee is present in this state for purposes of paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1 must include all days the nonresident employee is present and performing employment duties on behalf of the employer and any other related person.

For purposes of this subsection, “related person” means a person that, with respect to the employer during all or any portion of the taxable year, is:

A related entity;

A component member as defined in section 1563(b) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 1563(b)];

A person to or from whom there is attribution to stock ownership as provided in section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

A person that, notwithstanding its form of organization, bears the same relationship to the employer as a person described in subparagraphs a through c.

For purposes of this subsection, “related entity” means:

A stockholder who is an individual, or a member of the stockholder’s family as provided in section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 318] if the stockholder and the members of the stockholder’s family own, directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty percent of the value of the employer’s outstanding stock;

A stockholder, or a stockholder’s partnership, limited liability company, estate, trust, or corporation, if the stockholder and the stockholder’s partnerships, limited liability companies, estates, trusts, and corporations own, directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty percent of the value of the employer’s outstanding stock; or

A corporation, or a party related to the corporation in a manner that would require an attribution of stock from the corporation to the party or from the party to the corporation under the attribution rules of the federal Internal Revenue Code if the employer owns, directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, at least fifty percent of the value of the corporation’s outstanding stock. The attribution rules of the federal Internal Revenue Code shall apply for purposes of determining whether the ownership requirements of this definition have been met.

An employer that erroneously applies the income tax withholding exception solely as a result of miscalculating the number of days a nonresident employee is present in this state to perform employment duties shall not be subject to the penalty imposed in section 57-38-45 if:

The employer relied on the employer’s regularly maintained time and attendance system that:

Requires the employee to contemporaneously record the employee’s daily work location each day the employee is present in a state other than the employee’s state of residence; and

Is used by the employer to allocate the employee’s wages between all taxing jurisdictions in which the employee performs duties;

The employer relied on the employee’s travel records that the employer requires the employee to regularly maintain and contemporaneously record the employee’s travel and daily work location; or

The employer does not require the records described in paragraph 1 or 2, and relied on travel expense reimbursement records that the employer requires the employee to submit on a regular and contemporaneous basis.

This subsection establishes an exception to income tax withholding and deduction requirements and does not apply to the imposition of, or the state’s jurisdiction to impose this, or any other tax on the employer.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 464, § 2.

57-38-59.4.
Withholding requirement for oil and gas royalty payments to nonresidents.

For purposes of this section:

“Publicly traded partnership” means a publicly traded partnership as defined in section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 7704] which is not treated as a corporation.

“Remitter” means any person who distributes royalty payments to royalty owners.

“Royalty owner” means a person or entity entitled to receive periodic royalty payments for a nonworking interest in the production of oil or gas.

Except as provided in subsection 3, each remitter shall deduct and withhold from the gross amount of the royalty payment made to each nonresident individual or business entity that does not have its commercial domicile in this state at the highest marginal rate in section 57-38-30.3 minus three-fourths of one percent. Sections 57-38-59 and 57-38-60 apply to the filing of the returns and payment of the tax under this subsection.

This section does not apply to royalty payments made to a royalty owner if the royalty owner is:

The United States or an agency of the federal government, this state or a political subdivision of this state, or another state or a political subdivision of another state;

A federally recognized Indian tribe with respect to on-reservation oil and gas production pursuant to a lease entered under the Indian Mineral Leasing Act of 1938 [25 U.S.C. 396a through 396g];

The United States as trustee for individual Indians;

A publicly traded partnership;

An organization that is exempt from the tax under this chapter; or

The same person or entity as the remitter.

This section does not apply to a remitter that produced less than three hundred fifty thousand barrels of oil or less than five hundred million cubic feet of gas in the preceding calendar year as certified to the tax commissioner in the manner and on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner.

Each remitter that is exempt from withholding under this subsection shall make an annual return to report royalty payments that exceed the dollar amounts in subsection 6 and must be reported in the same manner as provided in section 57-38-60.

Each year, a publicly traded partnership that is exempt from withholding under subsection 3 shall transmit to the tax commissioner, in an electronic format approved by the tax commissioner, each partner’s United States department of the treasury schedule K-1, form 1065, or form 1065-B, as applicable, filed electronically for the year with the United States internal revenue service.

A royalty owner that is a publicly traded partnership, or an organization exempt from taxation under section 57-38-09, shall report to the remitter and tax commissioner under oath, on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, all information necessary to establish that the remitter is not required under subsection 2 to withhold royalty payments made to the partnership or organization.

If the royalty payment made to a royalty owner under this section is less than six hundred dollars for the current withholding period, or is less than one thousand dollars if the payment is annualized, the tax commissioner may grant a remitter’s request to forego withholding the tax from the royalty payment made to that royalty owner for the current withholding period or, if applicable, the royalty payments for the annual period.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 473, § 3; 2015, ch. 449, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

57-38-60.
Employer’s returns and remittances. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021]

Every employer shall, on or before the last day of April, July, October, and January, pay over to the tax commissioner the amount required to be deducted and withheld from wages paid to all employees during the preceding calendar quarter under section 57-38-59. If the amount required to be deducted and withheld from wages paid to all of an employer’s employees during the previous calendar year was less than one thousand dollars, the employer may file an annual return. The tax commissioner may alter the time or period for making reports and payment when in the tax commissioner’s opinion, the tax is in jeopardy, or may prescribe the use of any other time or period as will facilitate the collection and payment of the tax by the employer.

Every employer shall file a return on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner with each payment made to the tax commissioner under this section which shows the amount of tax imposed under this chapter which was deducted and withheld during the period covered by the return, and such other information as the tax commissioner may require. If the amount required to be deducted and withheld from wages paid to all an employer’s employees during the previous calendar year is one thousand dollars or more, the employer shall file the return and pay any tax due by electronic data interchange or other electronic media as determined by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may waive, upon a showing of good cause, the requirement to pay the tax due electronically.

Every employer required to withhold state income tax shall make an annual return to the tax commissioner on forms provided and approved by the tax commissioner, summarizing the total compensation paid, the federal income tax deducted and withheld, and the state income tax deducted and withheld during the calendar year. The annual return must be accompanied by a statement of the compensation paid, the federal income tax deducted and withheld, and the state income tax deducted and withheld for each employee. The annual return and accompanying statements must be filed with the tax commissioner on or before the due date for filing similar returns with the internal revenue service.

Every employer not required to withhold state income tax shall provide to the tax commissioner a statement of the compensation paid and the federal income tax deducted and withheld for each employee. The statement must be filed on or before the due date for filing similar returns with the internal revenue service.

In case of failure to timely file an information statement as required by subsections 3 and 4, and after thirty days’ notice to file is given by the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner may assess a penalty of ten dollars for each failure to file, not to exceed two thousand dollars.

Every employer shall also, in accordance with rules adopted by the tax commissioner, provide each employee from whom state income tax has been withheld, with a statement of the amounts of total compensation paid and the amounts deducted and withheld for the employee during the preceding calendar year in accordance with section 57-38-59. The statement must be made available to the employee on or before January thirty-first of the year following that for which the report is made.

The employer shall be liable to the tax commissioner for the payment of the tax required to be deducted and withheld under section 57-38-59, and the employee shall not thereafter be liable for the amount of any such payment, nor shall the employer be liable to any person or to any employee for the amount of any such payment. For the purpose of making penalty provisions of this chapter applicable, any amount deducted or required to be deducted and remitted to the tax commissioner under this section shall be considered to be the tax of the employer and with respect to such amounts the employer is considered the taxpayer.

Every employer who deducts and withholds any amounts under section 57-38-59 shall hold the same in trust for the state of North Dakota for payment thereof to the tax commissioner in the manner and at the time provided for in this section, and the state of North Dakota shall have a lien on the property of the employer to secure the payment of any amounts withheld and not remitted as provided herein, which lien shall attach at the time prescribed and to the property described in section 57-38-48 and shall be subject to the provisions of sections 57-38-49, 57-38-50, and 57-38-51.

An employer, at the discretion of the tax commissioner, may be required to either make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state in an amount reasonably calculated to ensure the payment to the state of taxes deducted and withheld from wages.

An employer is not subject to this section or section 57-38-59 for wages paid to any employee solely for agricultural labor, as defined in section 3121(g) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 3121(g)].

A payroll service provider authorized under the provisions of this chapter to file and remit withholding taxes on behalf of an employer shall file the return required by subsection 2 and pay any tax due, by electronic data interchange or other electronic media as determined by the tax commissioner. As used in this subsection, a “payroll service provider” means a person that, for federal tax purposes, electronically processes and transmits an employer’s withholding returns and taxes, including wage information returns. The tax commissioner may waive, upon a showing of good cause, the requirement to file a return or pay the tax electronically.

Any person required to file an information return under subsection 3 or 4 of this section shall file the return by electronic data interchange or other electronic media as determined by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may waive, upon a showing of good cause, the requirement to file the return electronically.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 3; 1987, ch. 695, § 4, R.M. approved March 18, 1987; S.L. 1991, ch. 672, § 6; 1991, ch. 675, § 1; 1993, ch. 269, § 4; 1995, ch. 566, § 1; 1997, ch. 491, § 3; 1999, ch. 514, § 1; 2001, ch. 532, § 1; 2003, ch. 533, § 1; 2019, ch. 493, §§ 1, 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2021, ch. 470, § 2, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021.

57-38-60.1.
Corporate officer liability.

If a corporation is an employer and fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of such returns and payments is personally liable for such failure. The dissolution of a corporation does not discharge an officer’s liability for a prior failure of the corporation to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the corporate officers elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual income tax withholding liability of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 636, § 1; 1987, ch. 695, § 5, R.M. approved March 18, 1987; S.L. 1999, ch. 509, § 3.

57-38-60.2.
Governor and manager liability.

If a limited liability company is an employer and fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the governors, managers, or members of a member-controlled limited liability company, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of the preparation of the returns and payments are personally liable for such failure. The dissolution of a limited liability company does not discharge a governor’s, manager’s, or member’s liability for a prior failure of the limited liability company to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the governors, managers, or members elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability company must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual income tax withholding liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 18; 1995, ch. 103, § 76; 1999, ch. 509, § 4; 2001, ch. 521, § 2.

57-38-60.3.
Liability of a general partner in a limited liability limited partnership.

If a limited liability limited partnership is an employer and fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the general partners, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility for the preparation of the returns and payment of the tax are personally liable for the partnership’s failure. The dissolution of a limited liability limited partnership does not discharge a general partner’s liability for a prior failure of the partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the general partners elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability limited partnership must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual income tax withholding liability of the limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 27.

57-38-61.
Provisions of chapter applicable.

The provisions of sections 57-38-33, 57-38-34, 57-38-38, 57-38-39, 57-38-40, 57-38-44, 57-38-45, 57-38-46, 57-38-47, 57-38-53, 57-38-54, 57-38-55, 57-38-56, and 57-38-57 shall, insofar as consistent therewith, govern the administration of sections 57-38-59, 57-38-60, and 57-38-60.1. The term “employer” as used in sections 57-38-59, 57-38-60, and 57-38-60.1 also means “taxpayer” as used in this chapter. In addition, the authority of the tax commissioner to adopt rules includes the authority to make such agreements with the United States government or any of its agencies as are necessary to provide for the deducting and withholding of tax from the wages of federal employees in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 4; 1973, ch. 476, § 1; 1981, ch. 91, § 59; 1983, ch. 636, § 2; 1985, ch. 82, § 148; 1985, ch. 636, § 2; 1987, ch. 695, § 6, R.M. approved March 18, 1987; 1993, ch. 269, § 5.